Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,114
Persons, defined.

The word persons as used in sections 25-21,112 to 25-21,120 includes natural and artificial persons.

Laws 1921, c. 130, § 3, p. 541;

C.S.1922, § 5678;

C.S.1929, § 76-403;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,114.